Illinois, session 104th, HB5480.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Fire Investigation Act is amended by 5changing Section 6.1 as follows: 6    (425 ILCS 25/6.1)7    Sec. 6.1. Fire and hazardous material incident reporting 8rules. The State Fire Marshal may adopt necessary rules for 9the administration of the reporting of fires, hazardous 10material incidents, and other incidents or events that the 11State Fire Marshal deems of importance to the fire services. 12The reporting of such information shall be based upon the 13nationally recognized standards of the United States Fire 14Administration's National Emergency Response Information 15System (NERIS) Fire Incident Reporting System (NFIRS).16(Source: P.A. 101-82, eff. 1-1-20.) 17    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 18becoming law.